Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 25.2 Rhode Island Home Loan Protection Act

34-25.2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Rhode Island Home Loan Protection Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that predatory lending has become an increasing problem in this state, threatening the viability of many communities and causing decreases in home ownership. While the marketplace may appear to be operating effectively for most home loans, too many homeowners are falling victim to unprincipled creditors who provide loans at exorbitant costs and include terms which are unnecessary to secure repayment of the loan. The general assembly finds that as competition and self-regulation have not eliminated the predatory terms for home-secured loans, the consumer protection provisions of this chapter are necessary to encourage responsible lending.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to prohibit predatory lending practices in this state while preserving access to credit in the subprime market.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-4.
Definitions.

The following definitions shall apply for the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accelerate” means the advancing of a loan agreement’s maturity date so that payment of the entire debt is due immediately.

“Affiliate” means any company that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another company, as set forth in 12 U.S.C. § 1841.

“Annual percentage rate” means the annual percentage rate for the loan calculated according to the provisions of 12 C.F.R. part 226.

“Bona fide discount points” means an amount knowingly paid by the borrower for the express purpose of reducing, and which in fact does result in a bona fide reduction of, the interest rate applicable to the home loan; provided the undiscounted interest rate for the home loan does not exceed the conventional mortgage rate by two (2) percentage points for a home loan secured by a first lien, or by three and one-half (3.5) percentage points for a home loan secured by a subordinated lien.

“Borrower” means any person obligated to repay the loan, including a co-borrower, co-signor or guarantor.

“Brokering” means to act as a loan broker as defined in Rhode Island general laws §

19-14-1

.

“Conventional mortgage rate” means the most recently published annual yield on conventional mortgages published by the board of governors of the Federal Reserve System, as published in statistical release H.15 or any publication that may supersede it, as of the applicable time set forth in 12 C.F.R. 226.32(a)(1)(i).

“Conventional prepayment penalty” means any prepayment penalty or fee that may be collected or charged in a home loan, and that is authorized by law other than this chapter, provided the home loan: (1) does not have an annual percentage rate that exceeds the conventional mortgage rate by more than two (2) percentage points; and (2) does not permit any prepayment fees or penalties that exceed two percent (2%) of the amount prepaid.

“Creditor” means any person who regularly makes available a home loan and shall include a loan broker.

“Department” means the department of business regulation.

“Director” means the director of the department of business regulation.

“High-cost home loan” means a home loan in which the terms of the loan meet or exceed one of more of the thresholds as defined in subsection (r) of this section.

“Home loan” means a loan, including an open-end credit plan, other than a reverse mortgage transaction, where the loan is secured by:

A mortgage or deed of trust on real estate in this state upon which there is located or there is to be located a structure or structures designed principally for occupancy of from one to four (4) families which is or will be occupied by a borrower as the borrower’s principal dwelling; or

A security interest on a manufactured home which is or will be occupied by a borrower as the borrower’s principal dwelling.

“Loan originator” means a natural person employee of a lender or loan broker that is required to be licensed under Rhode Island general laws §

19-14-1

et seq., and who for or with the expectation of a fee, commission or other valuable consideration and whose job responsibilities include direct contact with applicants during the loan application process, which includes soliciting, negotiating, acquiring, arranging or making mortgage loans, or who in connection with the taking of loan applications or the taking of loan pre-approval requests obtains personal financial information or other documents, quotes loan rates or terms, or provides required disclosures.

“Points and fees” means:

All items included in the definition of finance charge in 12 C.F.R. 226.4(a) and 12 C.F.R. 226.4(b) except interest or the time price differential;

All items described in 12 C.F.R. 226.32(b)(1)(iii);

All compensation paid directly by a borrower to a loan broker including a loan broker that originates a loan in its own name in a table-funded transaction;

All compensation paid indirectly to a loan broker from any source other than the borrower in excess of one percentage point of the total loan amount, including a loan broker that originates a loan in its own name in a table-funded transaction;

The cost of all premiums financed by the creditor, directly or indirectly for any credit life, credit disability, credit unemployment or credit property insurance, or any other life or health insurance, or any payments financed by the creditor directly or indirectly for any debt cancellation or suspension agreement or contract, except that insurance premiums or debt cancellation or suspension fees calculated and paid in full on a monthly basis shall not be considered financed by the creditor;

The maximum prepayment fees and penalties that may be charged or collected under the terms of the loan documents; and

All prepayment fees or penalties that are incurred by the borrower if the loan refinances a previous loan originated or currently held by the same creditor or an affiliate of the creditor.

For open-end loans, the points and fees are calculated by adding the total points and fees known at or before closing, including the maximum prepayment penalties which may be charged or collected under the terms of the loan documents, plus the minimum additional fees the borrower would be required to pay to draw down an amount equal to the total credit line.

Points and fees shall not include:

Points and fees up to and including one percent (1%) of the total loan amount attributable to bona fide fees paid to a federal or state government agency that insures payment of some portion of a home loan plus an amount not to exceed two percent (2%) of the total loan amount attributable to a bona fide discount points or a conventional prepayment penalty. In no case shall the total excluded points and fees in connection with a home loan exceed three percent (3%) of the total loan amount;

Taxes, filing fees, recording and other charges and fees paid or to be paid to public officials for determining the existence of or for perfecting, releasing or satisfying a security interest; or

Bona fide and reasonable fees paid to a person other than the creditor or an affiliate of the creditor for the following: fees for tax payment services; fees for flood certification; fees for pest infestation and flood determination; appraisal fees; fees for inspections performed prior to closing; credit reports; surveys; attorneys’ fees; notary fees; escrow charges, so long as not otherwise included under subparagraph (1) of this paragraph; title insurance premiums; and fire and hazard insurance and flood insurance premiums, provided that the conditions in 12 C.F.R. 226.4(d)(2) are met; or

“Predatory lending” means any act and practice which is found in violation of those acts and practices prohibited by §§

34-25.2-5

and

34-25.2-6

of this chapter.

“Tangible, net benefit” means at the time of refinancing a home loan(s), the new home loan(s) meet, at a minimum, one of the following:

The borrower’s new monthly payment(s) is lower than the total of all monthly obligations being financed, taking into account the costs and fees as disclosed on the HUD-1 settlement statement;

There is a beneficial change in the amortization period of the new loan(s);

The borrower receives cash in excess of the costs and fees, as disclosed on the HUD-1 settlement statement, as part of the refinancing;

The borrower’s current note rate of interest is reduced, or in the event more than one loan in being refinanced, the weighted average note rate of the current loans is reduced;

There is a change from an adjusted rate loan(s) to a fixed rate loan(s); or

The refinancing is necessary to respond to a bona fide personal need or an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

“Threshold” means any one of the following two (2) items, as defined:

“Rate threshold” means:

For a first lien mortgage home loan, an interest rate equal to eight (8) percentage points over the yield on comparable United States treasury securities on the fifteenth (15th) day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the loan application was received by the lender; and

For a subordinate mortgage lien, an interest rate equal to nine (9) percentage points over the yield on comparable United States treasury securities on the fifteenth (15th) day of the month immediately preceding the month in which the loan application was received by the lender;

“Total points and fees threshold” means:

For loans in which the total loan amount is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more, the total points and fees payable in connection with the home loan less any excluded points and fees exceed five percent (5%) of the total loan amount; and

For loans in which the total loan amount is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) the total points and fees payable in connection with the home loan less any excluded points and fees exceed eight percent (8%) of the total loan amount.

“Total loan amount” means the total amount the consumer will borrow, as reflected by the face amount of the note. For open-end loans, the total loan amount shall be calculated using the total line of credit allowed under the home loan at closing.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-5.
Prohibited acts and practices regarding home loans.

A home loan shall be subject to the following prohibited acts and practices.

No creditor making a home loan shall finance, directly or indirectly, any credit life, credit disability, credit unemployment or credit property insurance, or any other life or health insurance, or any payments directly or indirectly for any debt cancellation or suspension agreement or contract, except that insurance premiums or debt cancellation or suspension fees calculated and paid in full on a monthly basis shall not be considered financed by the creditor.

No creditor shall knowingly or intentionally engage in the unfair act or practice of flipping a home loan. “Flipping a home loan” is the making of a home loan to a borrower that refinances an existing home loan that was consummated within the prior sixty (60) months when the new loan does not have reasonable, tangible net benefit in accordance with subsection

34-25.2-4(q)

, to the borrower considering all of the circumstances, including, but not limited to, the terms of both the new and refinanced loans, the cost of the new loan, and the borrower’s circumstances.

No creditor shall recommend or encourage default on an existing loan or other debt prior to and in connection the closing or planned closing of a home loan that refinances all or any portion of such existing loan or debt.

No home loan may contain a provision that permits the creditor, in its sole discretion, to accelerate the indebtedness. This provision does not prohibit acceleration of the loan in good faith due to the borrower’s failure to abide by the material terms of the loan.

No home loan may contain a provision that allows a party to require a borrower to assert any claim or defense in a forum that is less convenient, more, costly, or more dilatory for the resolution of a dispute than a judicial forum established in this state where the borrower may otherwise properly bring a claim or defense or limits in any way claim or defense the borrower may have.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-6.
Limitations and prohibited practices regarding high-cost home loans.

A high-cost home loan shall be subject to the following additional limitations and prohibited practices:

In connection with a high-cost home loan, no creditor shall directly or indirectly finance any points or fees which total is greater than five percent (5%) of the total loan amount or eight hundred dollars ($800) whichever is greater.

No prepayment fees or penalties shall be included in the loan documents for a high-cost home loan.

No high-cost home loan may contain a scheduled payment that is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled payments. This provision does not apply when the payment schedule is adjusted to the seasonal or irregular income of the borrower.

No high-cost home loan may include payment terms under which the outstanding principal balance or accrued interest will increase at any time over the course of the loan because the regularly scheduled periodic payments do not cover the full amount of interest due.

No high-cost home loan may contain a provision that increases the interest rate after default. This provision does not apply to interest rate changes in a variable-rate loan otherwise consistent with the provisions of the loan documents, provided the change in the interest rate is not triggered by the event of default or the acceleration of the indebtedness.

No high-cost home loan may include terms under which more than two (2) periodic payments required under the loan are consolidated and paid in advance from the loan proceeds provided to the borrower.

A creditor may not make a high-cost home loan without first receiving certification from a counselor with a third-party nonprofit organization approved by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development that the borrower has received counseling on the advisability of the loan transaction.

A high-cost home loan shall not be extended to a borrower unless a reasonable creditor would believe at the time the loan is closed that one or more of the borrowers will be able to make the scheduled payments associated with the loan based upon a consideration of his or her current and expected income, current obligations, employment status, and other financial resources, other than the borrower’s equity in the collateral that secures the repayment of the loan. There is a rebuttable presumption that the borrower is able to make the scheduled payments to repay the obligation if, at the time the loan is consummated, said borrower’s total monthly debts, including amounts under the loan, do not exceed fifty percent (50%) of said borrower’s monthly gross income as verified by tax returns, payroll receipts, and other third-party income verification.

A creditor may not pay a contractor under a home-improvement contract from the proceeds of a high-cost home loan, unless:

The creditor is presented with a signed and dated completion certificate showing that the home improvements have been completed; and

The instrument is payable to the borrower or jointly to the borrower and the contractor, or, at the election of the borrower, through a third-party escrow agent in accordance with terms established in a written agreement signed by the borrower, the creditor, and the contractor prior to the disbursement.

A creditor may not charge a borrower any fees or other charges to modify, renew, extend, or amend a high-cost home loan or to defer any payment due under the terms of a high-cost home loan.

A creditor shall not make available a high-cost home loan that provides for a late payment fee except as follows:

The late payment fee shall not be in excess of three percent (3%) of the amount of the payment past due.

The late payment fee shall only be assessed for a payment past due for fifteen (15) days or more or ten (10) days or more in cases of bi-weekly mortgage payment arrangement.

The late payment fee shall not be imposed more than once with respect to a single late payment. If a late payment fee is deducted from a payment made on the loan, and the deduction causes a subsequent default on a subsequent payment, no late payment fee may be imposed for the default.

A creditor shall treat each payment as posted on the same business day as it was received.

All high-cost home loan documents that create a debt or pledge property as collateral shall contain the following notice on the first page in a conspicuous manner: “Notice: This a high-cost home loan subject to special rules under state law. Purchasers or assignees of this high-cost home loan may be liable for all claims and defenses by the borrower with respect to the home loan.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 1, § 22; P.L. 2017, ch. 451, § 14.

34-25.2-7.
Assignee liability.

Any person who purchases or is otherwise assigned a high-cost home loan shall be subject to all affirmative claims and any defenses with respect to the loan that the borrower could assert against the original creditor of the loan; provided, that this section shall not apply if the purchaser or assignee demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that it:

Has in place at the time of the purchase or assignment of the subject loans, policies that expressly prohibit its purchase or acceptance of assignment of any high-cost home loans;

Requires by contract that a seller or assignor of home loans to the purchaser or assignee represents and warrants to the purchaser or assignee that either: (a) the seller or assignor will not sell or assign any high-cost home loans to the purchaser or assignee; or (b) that such seller or assignor is a beneficiary of a representation and warranty from a previous seller or assignor to that effect; and

Exercises reasonable due diligence at the time of purchase or assignment of high-cost home loans or within a reasonable period of time after the purchase or assignment of such high-cost home loans, intended by the purchaser or assignee to prevent the purchaser or assignee from purchasing or taking assignment of any high-cost home loans; provided, further, that reasonable due diligence shall provide for sampling and shall not require loan-by-loan review.

In the event that a purchaser or assignee does not prevail under subsection (a), any recovery by a borrower, under this section, shall be limited to amounts required to reduce or extinguish the borrower’s liability under the high-cost home loan plus amounts required to recover costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees. Any such claim asserted by a borrower against a subsequent holder or assignee of the high-cost home loan may be asserted by a borrower acting only in an individual capacity and must be asserted as follows:

Within five (5) years of the closing of a high-cost home loan, a violation of this act in connection with the loan as an original action; and

At any time during the term of a high-cost home loan, after an action to collect on the high-cost home loan or foreclose on the collateral securing the high-cost home loan has been initiated or the debt arising from the high-cost home loan has been accelerated or the high-cost home loan has become sixty (60) days in default, any defense, claim or counterclaim, or action to enjoin foreclosure or preserve or obtain possession of the home that secures the loan.

The provisions of this section shall be effective notwithstanding any other provision of law; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the substantive rights, remedies or procedural rights available to a borrower against any creditor, assignee or holder under any other law.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 1.

34-25.2-8.
Civil action.

An aggrieved borrower or borrowers may bring a civil action for injunctive relief or damages in a court of competent jurisdiction for any violation of this chapter.

In addition, the court shall, as the court may consider appropriate:

Issue an order or injunction rescinding a home mortgage loan contract which violates this chapter, or barring the lender from collecting under any home mortgage loan which violates this chapter;

Issue an order or injunction barring any judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure or other lender action under the mortgage or deed of trust securing any home mortgage loan which violates this chapter;

Issue an order or injunction reforming the terms of the home mortgage loan to conform to this chapter;

Issue an order or injunction enjoining a lender from engaging in any prohibited conduct; or

Impose such other relief, including injunctive relief, as the court may consider just and equitable.

Originating or brokering a home loan that violates a provision of this section shall constitute a violation of this chapter.

A creditor in a home loan who, when acting in good faith, fails to comply with the provisions of this act, will not be deemed to have violated this section if the creditor establishes that either:

Within thirty (30) days of the loan closing and prior to the institution of any action under this chapter, the lender notifies the borrower of the compliance failure and makes appropriate restitution and whatever adjustments are necessary are made to the loan, at the choice of the borrower, to either:

make the high-cost home mortgage loan satisfy the requirements of this chapter; or

change the terms of the loan in a manner beneficial to the borrower so that the loan will no longer be considered a high-cost home mortgage loan; or

The compliance failure was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the errors, and within sixty (60) days after the discovery of the compliance failure and before the institution of any action under this chapter or the receipt of written notice of the compliance failure, the borrower is notified of the compliance failure, appropriate restitution is made and whatever adjustments are necessary are made to the loan, at the choice of the borrower, to either:

make the high-cost home mortgage loan satisfy the requirements of this chapter; or

change the terms of the loan in a manner beneficial to the borrower so that the loan will no longer be considered a high-cost home mortgage loan.

Examples of a bona fide error may include clerical errors, errors in calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors. An error in legal judgment with respect to a person’s obligation under this chapter shall not be considered a bona fide error.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this chapter regarding costs and attorneys’ fees, in any action instituted by a borrower who alleges that the defendant violated subsection

34-25.2-5(b)

, the borrower shall not be entitled to costs and attorneys’ fees if the presiding judge, in the judge’s discretion, finds that, before the institution of the action by the borrower, the lender made a reasonable offer to cure and that offer was rejected by the borrower.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-9.
Subterfuge prohibited.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person to attempt in bad faith to avoid the application of this chapter by:

Dividing any loan transaction into separate parts for the purpose of evading the provisions of this chapter;

Structuring a home loan transaction as an open-end loan for the purpose of evading the provisions of this chapter when the loan would have been a high-cost home loan if the loan had been structured as a closed-end loan;

Engaging in any other subterfuge with the intent of evading any provision of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 16.

34-25.2-10.
Rights in addition to other laws.

The rights conferred by this chapter are independent of and in addition to any other rights under other laws.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-11.
Exemption.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

Any national bank, federal savings bank, federal credit union, credit union, or financial institution, as defined under §

19-1-1

, or their wholly-owned subsidiary; and

The Federal Housing Administration, the Department of Veterans Affairs, or other state or federal housing finance agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 16.

34-25.2-12.
Department of business regulation.

The director may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Rules and regulations promulgated for subsections

34-25.2-4(q)

and

34-25.2-5(b)

may contain such factors, classifications, differentiations or other provisions, and may provide for such adjustments and exceptions for any class of transactions as, in the judgment of the director, are necessary or proper to carry out those sections, to prevent circumvention or evasion thereof or to facilitate compliance therewith.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-13.
Reporting.

The department shall report to the governor and the general assembly on or before January 1, 2009, with regard to the effectiveness of this act in achieving its purpose, which report shall include, but not be limited to:

The reported incidence of prohibited practices by calendar quarter for the period January 1, 2007 through June 30, 2008;

The disposition, if any, of the reported incidences of prohibited practices;

Findings and recommendations with regard to any improvements, amendments, or changes that should be considered to make the act more effective in achieving its purposes or which may be necessary in order to assure fair availability of credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 16.

34-25.2-14.
Liberal construction.

This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its declared purpose of protecting the homes and the equity of individual borrowers in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.

34-25.2-15.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 569, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 573, § 1.